Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB684.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3218.1 of Title 58 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes, declared unconstitutional, 147 A.3d 536 (Pa. 2016), is reenacted and amended to read:§ 3218.1. Notification to public and private drinking water systems.Upon receiving notification of a spill, the department shall, after investigating the incident, notify any public drinking water facility or private well owner that could be affected by the event that the event occurred. The notification shall contain a brief description of the event and any expected impact on water quality.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.1234567891011121314151617